Florida, session 2026, SB614.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 60 61 Section 1.âSection 947.161, Florida Statutes, is created to 62 read: 63 947.161âParole for long-term prisoners.â 64 (1)âNotwithstanding any other law and excluding death 65 sentences, a sentence of incarceration that exceeds 10 years for 66 an offense that did not result in death, or 20 years if the 67 offense resulted in death and for which the offender was not 68 designated a sexual predator, shall become a parole-eligible 69 sentence and the offender referred to the commission due to the 70 valuable rehabilitative incentive provided by parole-eligible 71 sentences and the success of parolees as compared to the lack 72 thereof with regard to parole-ineligible sentences and releases 73 notwithstanding any other provision of law, including any 74 applicable mandatory minimum term of imprisonment, prison 75 releasee reoffender, life sentence, or life-like sentence. This 76 section applies to any offender, including those sentenced on or 77 before the effective date of this section. 78 (2)âThe offender may apply to the commission for parole 79 consideration under this section only if he or she satisfies all 80 of the following requirements: 81 (a)âHas no disciplinary offenses in the 7 years before the 82 review and the overall number of offenses declined while he or 83 she was incarcerated. 84 (b)âPossesses a high school diploma or GED. 85 (c)âHas successfully completed a faith- and character-based 86 program within the department. 87 (d)âHas successfully completed victim impact education. 88 (e)âHas successfully completed anger management education. 89 (f)âHas completed alcohol and substance abuse programming 90 at least once if he or she has no drug or alcohol abuse history, 91 or, if there is a history of drug or alcohol abuse in the last 92 10 years, is currently enrolled in alcohol and substance abuse 93 programming. 94 (g)âHas taken rehabilitation classes, as demonstrated 95 through certificates of completion. 96 (h)âHas participated in the departmentâs Incentivized 97 Prison Program. 98 (i)âHas a written release plan. 99 (j)âIs 50 years of age or older. 100 (3)âAn offender released under this section must do all of 101 the following: 102 (a)âSubmit to community control conditions for a period of 103 1 year if the offense the offender committed did not result in a 104 death or 3 years if the offense resulted in a death. 105 (b)âParticipate in a transition home for a period of 1 106 year. 107 (c)âAdhere to a curfew from 10 p.m. to 6 a.m. 108 (d)âReport monthly to his or her supervising officer. 109 (e)âAppear in person at all parole hearings. 110 (f)âAttend Alcoholics Anonymous or Narcotics Anonymous for 111 a minimum period of 1 year if he or she has no substance abuse 112 history and 3 years if he or she has a substance abuse history. 113 (g)âWork a minimum of 20 hours per week, unless he or she 114 receives social security retirement benefits or social security 115 disability benefits. 116 (h)âPay restitution, if ordered. 117 (i)âVolunteer at least 4 hours a month at a correctional 118 institution in this state. 119 (j)âNot leave his or her county of residence without 120 permission. 121 (k)âHave no contact with any of his or her victims or any 122 of their family members unless approved in writing by the 123 commission. 124 (4)âSubject to legislative appropriation, of the savings 125 realized by the department as a result of this section: 126 (a)âFifty percent must be designated to fund law 127 enforcement programs designed to counter recidivism through 128 programs, education, and restorative justice practices. 129 (b)âTwenty-five percent must be designated to fund prison 130 and community-based programs designed to counter recidivism 131 through education, therapeutic intervention, maintenance of 132 family and social networks, restorative practices, and 133 successful post-custodial reentry to society. 134 (c)âTwenty-five percent must be designated to fund the 135 staffing of dedicated personnel in the offices of the 136 commission. 137 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.